District of Columbia statutes.
2-1210.12

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The rules may:

(1)

Provide for criteria under which a line of credit issued by a financial institution to a small business, a medium-sized business, or a nonprofit organization qualifies to participate in the program; and

(2)

Authorize a consortium of financial institutions to participate in the program subject to common underwriting guidelines.

History

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-322, § 13, 57 DCR 12442

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 13 of Capital Access Program Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-598, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11018).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 13 of Capital Access Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-6, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1408).